Illinois, session 104th, HB3995.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $90,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Office of the Attorney General to meet its 7operational expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 8    Section 10. The sum of $11,000,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for payment of 11awards and grants under the Violent Crime Victims Assistance 12Act. 13    Section 15. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 15Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for disbursement to 16the Illinois Equal Justice Foundation for use as provided in 17the Illinois Equal Justice Act. 18    Section 20. The sum of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 20Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for ordinary and 21contingent expenses and operational programs of the Medicaid   HB3995- 2 -LRB104 12498 HLH 22887 b1Fraud Control Unit. 2    Section 25. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for grants for 5organized retail crime enforcement. 6    Section 30. The sum of $6,850,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 8fund to the Office of the Attorney General for ordinary and 9contingent expenses and operational programs of the Child 10Support Enforcement Division. 11    Section 35. The sum of $1,200,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the Access to Justice 13Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for disbursement to 14the Illinois Equal Justice Foundation pursuant to the Access 15to Justice Act. 16    Section 40. The sum of $1,150,000, or so much thereof as is 17available for use by the Attorney General, is appropriated to 18the Attorney General from the Illinois Gaming Law Enforcement 19Fund for State law enforcement purposes. 20    Section 45. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Attorney   HB3995- 3 -LRB104 12498 HLH 22887 b1General from the Domestic Violence Fund pursuant to Public Act 295-711 for grants to public or private nonprofit agencies for 3the purposes of facilitating or providing free domestic 4violence legal advocacy, assistance, or services to victims of 5domestic violence who are married or formerly married or 6parties or former parties to a civil union related to order of 7protection proceedings, or other proceedings for civil 8remedies for domestic violence. 9    Section 50. The sum of $3,750,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 11Tobacco Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for the 12oversight, enforcement, and implementation of the Master 13Settlement Agreement entered in the case of People of the 14State of Illinois v. Philip Morris, et al (Circuit Court of 15Cook County, No. 96L13146), for the administration and 16enforcement of the Tobacco Product Manufacturers' Escrow Act, 17for the handling of tobacco-related litigation, and for other 18law enforcement activities of the Attorney General. 19    Section 55. The sum of $13,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 21Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment Projects Fund 22to the Office of the Attorney General for use, subject to 23pertinent court order or agreement, in the performance of any 24function pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the   HB3995- 4 -LRB104 12498 HLH 22887 b1Attorney General, including State law enforcement and public 2education. 3    Section 60. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Charity 5Bureau Fund to the Office of the Attorney General to enforce 6the provisions of the Solicitation for Charity Act and to 7gather and disseminate information about charitable trustees 8and organizations to the public. 9    Section 65. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 11Whistleblower Reward and Protection Fund to the Office of the 12Attorney General for ordinary and contingent expenses, 13including State law enforcement purposes. 14    Section 70. The sum of $23,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General's 16State Projects and Court Ordered Distribution Fund to the 17Attorney General for payment of interagency agreements, for 18court-ordered distributions to third parties, and subject to 19pertinent court order, for performance of any function 20pertaining to the exercise of the duties of the Attorney 21General, including State law enforcement and public education. 22    Section 75. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as   HB3995- 5 -LRB104 12498 HLH 22887 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the Cannabis 2Expungement Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 3disbursement to the Illinois Equal Justice Foundation for use 4as provided in the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 5    Section 80. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the Violent Crime 7Victims Assistance Fund to the Office of the Attorney General 8for the payment of awards and grants under the Violent Crime 9Victims Assistance Act. 10    Section 85. The sum of $350,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the Violent Crime Victims 12Assistance Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 13grants to public or private nonprofit agencies for the 14purposes of facilitating or providing free domestic violence 15legal advocacy, assistance, or services to victims of domestic 16violence who are married or formerly married, or who are 17parties or former parties to a civil union, related to an order 18of protection proceeding or other proceeding for civil 19remedies for domestic violence. 20    Section 90. The sum of $215,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General Sex 22Offender Awareness, Training, and Education Fund to the Office 23of the Attorney General to administer the I-SORT program and   HB3995- 6 -LRB104 12498 HLH 22887 b1to alert and educate the public, victims, and witnesses of 2their rights under various victim notification laws, and for 3training law enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and 4medical providers regarding their legal duties concerning the 5prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 6    Section 100. The sum of $11,000,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Attorney General 8Federal Grant Fund to the Office of the Attorney General for 9funding for federal grants. 10    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112025.